Missouri, session 2026, SB1473.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 393.2500, to read as
follows:
393.2500. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service
commission;
(2) "Customer-generator", the same as defined in
section 386.890;
(3) "Electrical corporation", the same as defined in
section 386.020;
(4) "Energy storage system", commercially available
technology that is capable of absorbing energy and storing
it for a period of time for use at a later time, including
but not limited to electrochemical, thermal, and
electromechanical technologies, and may be interconnected
behind the customer's meter or interconnected behind its own
meter;
(5) "Smart inverter", a device that converts direct
current from solar panels into alternating current and meets

SB 1473 2
all applicable safety, performance, interconnection, and
reliability standards established by the National Electrical
Code, the National Electrical Safety Code, the Institute of
Electrical and Electronics Engineers, Underwriters
Laboratories, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and
any local governing authorities.
2. Within ninety days after August 28, 2026, an
electrical corporation shall file an application with the
commission requesting approval of the corporation's tariff
to provide a rebate to any customer-generator installing any
energy storage system and, if applicable, a new solar
electric system at the customer-generator's premises for the
customer-generator's own use. The rebate shall be as
follows:
(1) Two dollars per watt for systems becoming
operational on or before June 30, 2027;
(2) One dollar and fifty cents per watt for systems
becoming operational between July 1, 2027, and June 30, 2028;
(3) One dollar per watt for systems becoming
operational between July 1, 2028, and June 30, 2029;
(4) Fifty cents per watt for systems becoming
operational between July 1, 2029, and June 30, 2030;
(5) Fifty cents per watt for systems becoming
operational between July 1, 2030, and June 30, 2031; or
(6) Twenty-five cents per watt for systems becoming
operational between July 1, 2031, and June 30, 2032.
The rebate amounts under this subsection shall be issued
until such funds expire or exceed the allotted amounts. An
electrical corporation may, through its tariffs, require
applications for rebates to be submitted by customer-

SB 1473 3
generators up to one hundred and eighty days prior to June
30, 2027.
3. The commission shall review the application under
subsection 2 of this section and make modifications, if
necessary, that are consistent with the commission's
authority under chapter 386. No later than one hundred and
eighty days after the electrical corporation files the
application under subsection 2 of this section, the
commission shall hold a hearing and issue an order
approving, or approving with modifications, the tariff.
4. To be eligible for a rebate under this section, a
customer-generator shall:
(1) Have a smart inverter installed at the customer's
premises that is interconnected to distribution facilities
owned or operated by an electrical corporation;
(2) Install an energy storage system;
(3) Connect an energy storage system to a new or
existing solar electric system sited on the customer-
generator's premises that is confirmed by the electrical
corporation to have become operational and in compliance
with the provisions of section 386.890; and
(4) Transfer to the electrical corporation all rights,
titles, and interest in and to the renewable energy credits
associated with the solar electric system and energy storage
system that qualified the customer-generator for the rebate
for a period of ten years from the date the electrical
corporation confirmed that the energy storage system was
installed and operational.
5. An electrical corporation's obligation to make
rebate payments under this section shall not exceed the
following limitations:

SB 1473 4
(1) As of August 28, 2026, an electrical corporation
with one million or more customers in the state shall not be
obligated to pay rebates in any calendar year from 2026
through 2032 in an amount exceeding five million six hundred
thousand dollars or in an aggregate amount exceeding twenty-
eight million dollars;
(2) As of August 28, 2026, an electrical corporation
with less than one million but more than two hundred
thousand customers in the state shall not be obligated to
pay rebates in any calendar year from 2026 through 2032 in
an amount exceeding one million six hundred thousand dollars
or in an aggregate amount exceeding eight million dollars;
and
(3) As of August 28, 2026, an electrical corporation
with two hundred thousand or less customers in the state
shall not be obligated to pay rebates in any calendar year
from 2026 through 2032 in an amount exceeding one million
four hundred thousand dollars or in an aggregate amount
exceeding seven million dollars.
6. After the issuance of the rebate under this
section, an electrical corporation shall be permitted to
100 recover the cost of all rebate payments it has made through
101 either base rates or a rate adjustment mechanism under
102 section 393.1030 and shall also be permitted to defer and
103 amortize the recovery of such costs, including interest at
104 the electrical corporation's short-term borrowing rate,
105 through either base rates or a surcharge over a period of
106 the electrical corporation's choice not to exceed five
107 years, provided that if recovery of such costs in such
108 manner and over such a time period would cause the
109 electrical corporation to exceed the one percent maximum
110 average retail rate increase limitation required by

SB 1473 5
111 subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of section 393.1030. The
112 recovery of such costs that would exceed the one percent
113 maximum average retail rate increase limitation shall be
114 deferred by the electrical corporation to a regulatory asset
115 to which carrying costs at the electrical corporation's
116 weighted average cost of capital shall be added and
117 recovered through base rates or through a rate adjustment
118 mechanism under section 393.1030, as soon as practicable.
119 7. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement
120 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
121 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
122 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
123 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
124 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
125 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
126 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
127 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
128 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
129 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
130 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
131 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓